Indiana, session 2026, SB172.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-12-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 2.5. Administrative Rules Oversight Committee
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agency" has the meaning set
forth in IC 4-22-2-3.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "committee" refers to the
administrative rules oversight committee established by section 4
of this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "rule" has the meaning set forth
in IC 4-22-2-3.
Sec. 4. The administrative rules oversight committee is
established.
Sec. 5. (a) The committee consists of the following twelve (12)
members of the general assembly:
(1) The chairperson of the senate appropriations committee.
(2) The ranking majority member of the senate
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


appropriations committee.
(3) The chairperson of the senate tax and fiscal policy
committee.
(4) The ranking majority member of the senate tax and fiscal
policy committee.
(5) The chairperson of the house ways and means committee.
(6) The ranking majority member of the house ways and
means committee.
(7) The chairperson of the house government and regulatory
reform committee.
(8) The ranking majority member of the house government
and regulatory reform committee.
(9) Two (2) minority members of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives as
follows:
(A) The ranking minority member of the house ways and
means committee.
(B) One (1) other minority member of the house ways and
means committee.
(10) Two (2) minority members of the senate appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate as follows:
(A) The ranking minority member of the senate
appropriations committee.
(B) The ranking minority member of the senate tax and
fiscal policy committee.
(b) Legislative appointments to the committee under subsection
(a)(9) and (a)(10) shall be made within fifteen (15) days after the
official selection of the president pro tempore of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives. However, in the case of
2026, the legislative appointments to the committee under
subsection (a)(9) and (a)(10) shall made after the adjournment sine
die of the second regular session of the one hundred twenty-fourth
general assembly and before July 1, 2026. Each member appointed
under subsection (a)(9) and (a)(10) shall serve at the will and
pleasure of the member's respective appointing leadership or until
the member's term as a member of the general assembly expires,
whichever is shorter.
(c) Any vacancy occurring on the committee must be filled by
the appointing authority for the unexpired term.
Sec. 6. (a) The chairperson of the committee shall be:
(1) the chairperson of the senate appropriations committee, in
those years that the chairperson of the house ways and means
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


committee is serving as the chair of the budget committee;
and
(2) the chairperson of the house ways and means committee,
in those years that the chairperson of the senate
appropriations committee is serving as the chair of the budget
committee.
(b) Unless the committee has no agenda, the committee shall
meet on those same days of the year and at the same location that
the budget committee has fixed to meet. The committee shall fix the
time for its meetings.
Sec. 7. (a) The rule of any agency shall be subject to committee
review if the implementation and compliance costs of the proposed
rule are expected to exceed the threshold set forth in
IC 4-22-2-22.7(c)(6).
(b) However, this section does not apply to a rule described in
IC 4-22-2-22.7(f).
(c) For purposes of any statute that requires committee review
before an action may be taken by a state agency or other entity,
committee review is considered to have taken place when the action
requiring review has been included on an approved agenda of the
committee in the part of the agenda concerning review items.
Sec. 8. (a) Seven (7) members of the committee constitute a
quorum.
(b) The affirmative vote of seven (7) members of the committee
is required for the committee to take any action.
Sec. 9. (a) Each member of the committee is entitled to receive
the same per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid to members
of the general assembly serving on interim study committees
established by the legislative council. These expenses shall be paid
from funds appropriated to the legislative council.
(b) Members of the committee shall not receive a salary per
diem under this section if the member receives any salary per diem
for the member's services at a budget committee meeting on the
same day under IC 4-12-1-11(b).
Sec. 10. Staff for the committee shall be provided by the
legislative services agency.
SECTION 2. IC 4-22-2-19.6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2024,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19.6. (a) A rule adopted under this article or
IC 13-14-9 that includes a fee, fine, or civil penalty must comply with
this section. Subsections (b), (c), and (d) do not apply to a rule that
must be adopted in a certain form to comply with federal law.
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


(b) For each fee, fine, or civil penalty imposed by an agency that is
not set as a specific amount in a state law, a rule must describe the
circumstances for which the agency will assess a fee, fine, or civil
penalty and set forth the amount of the fee, fine, or civil penalty:
(1) as a specific dollar amount;
(2) under a formula by which a specific dollar amount can be
reasonably calculated by persons regulated or otherwise affected
by the rule; or
(3) as a range of potential dollar amounts, stating the factors that
the agency will utilize to set a specific dollar amount in an
individual case with sufficient certainty that a review of an agency
action under IC 4-21.5 or comparable process can evaluate
whether the amount was reasonable.
A rule concerning fines or civil penalties does not prohibit an agency
to enter into a settlement agreement with a person against whom a fine
or civil penalty is being assessed to determine the fine or civil penalty
to be paid for a violation.
(c) The amount of a fee must be reasonably based on the amount
necessary to carry out the purposes for which the fee is imposed.
(d) An agency setting a fine or civil penalty shall consider the
following:
(1) Whether the violation has a major or minor impact on the
health, safety, or welfare of a person, the health or safety of
animals or natural resources, or other facts set forth in the
agency's rule.
(2) The number of previous violations committed by the offender
of laws, rules, or programs administered by the agency.
(3) The need for deterrence of future violations.
(4) Whether the conduct, if proved beyond a reasonable doubt,
would constitute a criminal offense, and the level of penalty set by
law for the criminal offense.
(e) An agency is not liable for a fee, fine, or civil penalty that is not
in conformity with this section if
(1) the fee, fine, or civil penalty was included in a rule that
became effective before January 1, 2023, and that otherwise
complies with subsection (b).
(2) the fee, fine, or civil penalty was:
(A) set by an agency before January 1, 2023;
(B) reviewed by the budget committee:
(i) in the case of the department of environmental
management, the boards listed in IC 13-14-9-1, the natural
resources commission, the department of natural resources,
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


the Indiana gaming commission, and the Indiana horse
racing commission, before December 31, 2023; and
(ii) in the case of an agency not described in item (i), before
July 1, 2024; and
(C) included in a rule that complies with this section and
becomes effective before:
(i) in the case of the department of environmental
management, the boards listed in IC 13-14-9-1, the natural
resources commission, the department of natural resources,
the Indiana gaming commission, and the Indiana horse
racing commission, December 31, 2024; and
(ii) in the case of an agency not described in item (i), July 1,
2025; or
(3) the agency withdraws or otherwise ceases to enforce or apply
the fee, fine, or civil penalty before:
(A) in the case of the department of environmental
management, the boards listed in IC 13-14-9-1, the natural
resources commission, the department of natural resources, the
Indiana gaming commission, and the Indiana horse racing
commission, December 31, 2023; and
(B) in the case of an agency not described in clause (A), July
1, 2024.
Readoption without changes under IC 4-22-2.6 of a nonconforming fee,
fine, or civil penalty that meets the requirements of subdivision (1) or
(2) does not invalidate the nonconforming fee, fine, or civil penalty.
(f) Beginning January 1, 2024, an agency shall post on its website
a schedule of fines and civil penalties that apply to violations of laws,
rules, and requirements of federal programs administered by the
agency.
SECTION 3. IC 4-22-2-22.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22.7. (a) Before complying with section 22.8,
37.1, or 37.2 of this chapter, an agency shall conduct a regulatory
analysis for the proposed rule that complies with the requirements of
this section.
(b) The office of management and budget shall set standards for the
criteria, analytical method, treatment technology, economic, fiscal, and
other background data to be used by an agency in the regulatory
analysis. The regulatory analysis must be submitted in a form that can
be easily loaded into commonly used business analysis software and
published in the Indiana Register using the format jointly developed by
the publisher, the office of management and budget, and the budget
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


agency. The office of management and budget may provide more
stringent requirements for rules with fiscal impacts and costs above a
threshold amount determined by the office of management and budget.
(c) At a minimum, the regulatory analysis must include findings and
any supporting data, studies, or analyses prepared for a rule that
demonstrate compliance with the following:
(1) The cost benefit requirements in IC 4-3-22-13.
(2) Each of the standards in section 19.5 of this chapter.
(3) If applicable, the requirements for fees, fines, and civil
penalties in section 19.6 of this chapter.
(4) The annual economic impact on small businesses statement
required under IC 4-22-2.1-5.
(5) If applicable, the information required under IC 13-14-9-4.
(6) A determination whether the combined implementation and
compliance costs of a proposed rule are at least one million
dollars ($1,000,000) one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
for businesses, units, and individuals over any two (2) one (1)
year period.
(7) Any requirement under any other law to conduct an analysis
of the cost, benefits, economic impact, or fiscal impact of a rule,
if applicable.
(d) The regulatory analysis must include a statement justifying any
requirement or cost that is:
(1) imposed on a regulated entity under the rule; and
(2) not expressly required by:
(A) the statute authorizing the agency to adopt the rule; or
(B) any other state or federal law.
The statement required under this subsection must include a reference
to any data, studies, or analyses relied upon by the agency in
determining that the imposition of the requirement or cost is necessary.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f), if the implementation and
compliance costs of a proposed rule are expected to exceed the
threshold set forth in subsection (c)(6), the publisher may not publish
the proposed rule until the budget committee administrative rules
oversight committee has reviewed the rule.
(f) Subsection (e) does not apply to a proposed rule if the proposed
rule is:
(1) a provisional rule that was issued as the result of the governor
declaring an emergency under IC 10-14-3 and is only valid during
the emergency;
(2) a provisional or interim rule that complies only with the
requirements of a:
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


(A) federal law;
(B) federal regulation; or
(C) federal grant or loan program; or
(3) an interim rule that incorporates a new or updated:
(A) building;
(B) equipment;
(C) firefighting;
(D) safety; or
(E) professional;
code.
(g) If an agency has made a good faith effort to comply with this
section, a rule is not invalid solely because the regulatory analysis for
the proposed rule is insufficient or inaccurate.
SECTION 4. IC 4-22-2-22.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22.8. (a) After conducting a regulatory analysis
under section 22.7 of this chapter, if an agency elects to adopt may
begin rulemaking procedures for a rule subject to section 23 of this
chapter or IC 13-14-9 only if the agency has demonstrated to the
satisfaction of the governor that the rule meets at least one (1) of
the following conditions:
(1) The combined implementation and compliance costs of the
rule do not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000)
for businesses, units, and individuals over any two (2) year
period.
(2) The rule is necessary to comply with a deadline established
by federal or state law.
(3) The rule is necessary to comply with an order of a court.
(4) The rule is related to the licensing and regulating of health
care services or health care facilities.
(5) The rule is necessary for a reason listed in section
37.1(b)(1) of this chapter.
(6) The rule is necessary to implement a program or category
of rule listed in section 37.2(b) of this chapter.
(b) The agency shall submit a request to the budget agency and the
office of management and budget to authorize commencement of the
public comment periods under this chapter or IC 13-14-9 (as
applicable). governor to authorize the use of rulemaking
procedures in the form and in the manner required by the
governor. The request must include the following:
(1) A general description of the subject matter of the proposed
rule.
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


(2) The full text of the proposed rule (including a copy of any
matter incorporated by reference under section 21 of this chapter)
in the form required by the publisher, including citations to any
related authorizing and affected Indiana statutes.
(3) The regulatory analysis, including supporting data, prepared
under section 22.7 of this chapter.
(4) Any other information required by the office of management
and budget. governor.
(c) The governor may do the following:
(1) Return the request to the agency with a statement
describing any additional information needed to authorize or
disapprove further rulemaking actions on one (1) or more of
the rules in the request.
(2) Authorize the use of rulemaking procedures for one (1) or
more of the rules in the request with or without changes.
(3) Disapprove the use of rulemaking procedures for one (1)
or more of the rules with a statement of reasons for the
disapproval.
(d) If the governor authorizes the use of rulemaking procedures
and the agency elects to adopt a rule subject to section 23 of this
chapter or IC 13-14-9, the agency shall submit a request to the
budget agency and the office of management and budget to
authorize commencement of the public comment periods under this
chapter or IC 13-14-9 (as applicable). The request must include the
documents submitted to the governor under subsection (b) and any
other information required by the budget agency or the office of
management and budget.
(b) (e) The budget agency and the office of management and budget
shall expedite the review of the request to adopt a rule. The budget
agency and the office of management and budget may do the following:
(1) Return the request to the agency with a statement describing
any additional information needed to authorize or disapprove
further rulemaking actions on one (1) or more of the rules in the
request.
(2) Authorize the commencement of the public comment periods
on one (1) or more of the rules in the request with or without
changes.
(3) Disapprove commencement of the public comment periods on
one (1) or more of the rules with a statement of reasons for the
disapproval.
(c) (f) If an agency has requested authorization for more than one
(1) rule in the same request, the governor or the budget agency and
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


the office of management and budget, as applicable, may make
separate determinations with respect to some or all of the rules in the
request. Approval of a request shall be treated as a determination that
the review conducted and findings made by the agency comply with the
requirements of section 22.7 of this chapter and this section. The
budget agency and the office of management and budget may not
approve any part of a proposed rule that adds or amends language to
increase or expand application of a fee, fine, or civil penalty or a
schedule of fees, fines, or civil penalties before submitting the
proposed rule to the budget committee administrative rules oversight
committee for review.
(d) (g) If the implementation and compliance costs of a proposed
rule are expected to exceed the threshold set forth in section 22.7(c)(6)
of this chapter, the office of management and budget shall submit the
rule to the legislative council, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6,
within thirty (30) days of completing the review of the regulatory
analysis. The chairperson of the legislative council shall inform
members of the budget committee administrative rules oversight
committee of a rule submitted under this subsection. The budget
agency and the office of management and budget may not approve any
part of a proposed rule covered by this subsection prior to review of the
proposed rule by the budget committee. administrative rules
oversight committee.
(e) (h) Notice of the determination each determination under this
section shall be provided to the agency in an electronic format required
by the publisher. The governor, the budget agency, and the office of
management and budget may return to the agency any copy of a matter
incorporated by reference under section 21 of this chapter that was
submitted with the request.
(f) (i) If an agency revises a proposed rule after the:
(1) governor approves the use of rulemaking procedures; or
(2) budget agency and the office of management and budget
authorize commencement of the public comment periods;
the agency must obtain a new notice of determination under subsection
(e). (b) or (d), or both, as applicable. The agency shall resubmit to the
governor or to the budget agency and the office of management and
budget the revised proposed rule and a revised regulatory analysis with
sufficient information for the governor or the budget agency and the
office of management and budget to determine the impact the revisions
have on the regulatory analysis previously reviewed by the governor
or the budget agency and the office of management and budget. After
obtaining a new notice or notices of determination, the agency shall
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


submit to the publisher the new notice or notices of determination, the
revised proposed rule, and the revised regulatory analysis.
SECTION 5. IC 4-22-2-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) An agency shall provide notice in the
Indiana Register of the first public comment period required by this
section. To publish notice of the first public comment period in the
Indiana Register, the agency must submit the following to the
publisher:
(1) A statement of the date, time, and place at which the hearing
required by section 26 of this chapter will be convened, including
information for how to attend the public hearing remotely.
(2) The full text of the agency's proposed rule in the form required
by section 20 of this chapter and the documents required by
section 21 of this chapter.
(3) The latest version of the regulatory analysis submitted to the
budget agency and the office of management and budget under
section 22.8 of this chapter.
(4) The determination of the governor authorizing the use of
rulemaking procedures.
(4) (5) The determination of the budget agency and the office of
management and budget authorizing commencement of the public
comment periods.
(5) (6) If the proposed rule adds or amends language to increase
or expand application of a fee, fine, or civil penalty or a schedule
of fees, fines, or civil penalties, the agenda of the budget
committee administrative rules oversight committee meeting
at which the rule was scheduled for review.
(6) (7) If the proposed rule is expected to exceed the threshold set
forth in section 22.7(c)(6) of this chapter, the agenda of the
budget committee administrative rules oversight committee
meeting at which the rule was scheduled for review.
(7) (8) The notice required under subsection (b).
(b) The notice of the first public comment period must include the
following:
(1) A general description of the subject matter of the proposed
rule.
(2) An overview of the intent and scope of the proposed rule and
the statutory authority for the rule.
(3) The latest version of the regulatory analysis submitted to the
budget agency and the office of management and budget under
section 22.8 of this chapter, excluding any appendices containing
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


any data, studies, or analyses referenced in the regulatory
analysis.
(4) Information concerning where, when, and how a person may
submit written comments on the proposed rule, including contact
information concerning the small business regulatory coordinator
required by section 28.1 of this chapter.
(5) Information concerning where, when, and how a person may
inspect and copy the regulatory analysis, and any data, studies, or
analyses referenced under subdivision (3).
(6) Information concerning where, when, and how a person may
inspect any documents incorporated by reference into the
proposed rule under section 21 of this chapter.
(7) An indication that, if the agency does not receive any
substantive comments during the public comment period or
public hearing, the agency may adopt a rule that is the same as or
does not substantially differ from the text of the proposed rule
published under this section.
Inadequacy or insufficiency of the published description or regulatory
analysis in a notice published under this section does not invalidate a
rulemaking action.
(c) Although the agency may comply with the publication
requirements of this section on different days, the agency must comply
with all of the publication requirements of this section at least thirty
(30) days before the public hearing required by section 26 of this
chapter is convened.
(d) The publisher shall review materials submitted under this
section and determine the date that the publisher intends to publish the
text of the proposed rule and the notice in the Indiana Register. If the
submitted material complies with this section, the publisher shall
establish the intended publication date, assign a document control
number to the proposed rule, and provide a written or an electronic
mail authorization to proceed to the agency. The publisher shall publish
the following in the Indiana Register on the intended publication date:
(1) The notice of the first public comment period, including any
information required under IC 13-14-9-4 (if applicable).
(2) The full text of the agency's proposed rule (excluding the full
text of a matter incorporated by reference under section 21 of this
chapter).
SECTION 6. IC 4-22-2-37.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 37.1. (a) The following do not apply to a rule
adopted under this section:
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


(1) Sections 23 through 27 of this chapter or IC 13-14-9 (as
applicable).
(2) Sections 28 through 36 of this chapter.
The amendments to this section made in the 2023 regular session of the
general assembly apply to provisional rules that are accepted for filing
by the publisher of the Indiana Register after June 30, 2023, regardless
of whether the adopting agency initiated official action to adopt the rule
by the name of emergency rule or provisional rule before July 1, 2023.
An action taken before July 1, 2023, in conformity with this section (as
effective after June 30, 2023) is validated to the same extent as if the
action was taken after June 30, 2023.
(b) An agency may adopt a rule on a subject for which the agency
has rulemaking authority using the procedures in this section if the
governor finds that the agency proposing to adopt the rule has
demonstrated to the satisfaction of the governor that use of provisional
rulemaking procedures under this section:
(1) is necessary to avoid:
(1) (A) an imminent and a substantial peril to public health,
safety, or welfare;
(2) (B) an imminent and a material loss of federal funds for an
agency program;
(3) (C) an imminent and a material deficit;
(4) (D) an imminent and a substantial violation of a state or
federal law or the terms of a federal agreement or program;
(5) (E) injury to the business or interests of the people or any
public utility of Indiana as determined under IC 8-1-2-113;
(6) (F) an imminent and a substantial peril to:
(A) (i) wildlife; or
(B) (ii) domestic animal;
health, safety, or welfare; or
(7) (G) the spread of invasive species, pests, or diseases
affecting plants; and
(2) will result in a rule for which the combined
implementation and compliance costs of the rule would not
exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for
businesses, units, and individuals if effective over a two (2)
year period.
To obtain a determination from the governor, an agency must submit
to the governor the text of the proposed provisional rule, the regulatory
analysis required under section 22.7 of this chapter, a statement
justifying the need for provisional rulemaking procedures, and any
additional information required by the governor in the form and in the
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


manner required by the governor.
(c) The governor may not approve provisional rulemaking for any
part of a proposed provisional rule that:
(1) adds or amends language to increase or expand application of
a fee, fine, or civil penalty or a schedule of fees, fines, or civil
penalties; or
(2) is expected to exceed the threshold set forth in section
22.7(c)(6) of this chapter;
prior to the budget committee's administrative rules oversight
committee's review of the proposed provisional rule. A notice of
determination by the governor shall include findings that explain the
basis for the determination. The notice of determination shall be
provided to the agency in an electronic format. Approval of a request
shall be treated as a determination that the rule meets the criteria in
subsection (b) and this subsection.
(d) After the governor approves provisional rulemaking procedures
for a rule but before the agency adopts the provisional rule, the agency
shall obtain a document control number from the publisher. The
publisher shall determine the documents and the format of the
documents that must be submitted to the publisher to obtain a
document control number. The agency must submit at least the
following:
(1) The full text of the proposed provisional rule in the form
required by section 20 of this chapter.
(2) The regulatory analysis submitted to the governor under
subsection (b).
(3) A statement justifying the need for provisional rulemaking.
(4) The approval of the governor to use provisional rulemaking
procedures required by law.
(5) The documents required by section 21 of this chapter.
(6) If the proposed provisional rule adds or amends language to
increase or expand the application of a fee, fine, or civil penalty,
or a schedule of fees, fines, or civil penalties, the agenda of the
budget committee administrative rules oversight committee
meeting at which the rule was scheduled for review.
(7) If the proposed provisional rule is expected to exceed the
threshold set forth in section 22.7(c)(6) of this chapter, the agenda
of the budget committee administrative rules oversight
committee meeting at which the rule was scheduled for review.
An agency may not adopt a proposed provisional rule until after the
publisher notifies the agency that the publisher has complied with
subsection (e). At least ten (10) regular business days must elapse after
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


the publisher has complied with subsection (e) before the department
of natural resources, the natural resources commission, the department
of environmental management, or a board that has rulemaking authority
under IC 13 adopts a provisional rule.
(e) Upon receipt of documents described in subsection (d), the
publisher shall distribute the full text of the proposed provisional rule
to legislators and legislative committees in the manner and the form
specified by the legislative council or the personnel subcommittee of
the legislative council acting for the legislative council. After
distribution has occurred, the publisher shall notify the agency of the
date that distribution under this subsection has occurred.
(f) After the document control number has been assigned and the
agency adopts the provisional rule, the agency shall submit the
following to the publisher for filing:
(1) The text of the adopted provisional rule. The agency shall
submit the provisional rule in the form required by section 20 of
this chapter.
(2) A signature page that indicates that the agency has adopted the
provisional rule in conformity with all procedures required by
law.
(3) The documents required by section 21 of this chapter.
The publisher shall determine the format of the provisional rule and
other documents to be submitted under this subsection. The substantive
text of the adopted provisional rule must be substantially similar to the
text of the proposed provisional rule submitted to the governor. A
provisional rule may suspend but not repeal a rule approved by the
governor under section 34 of this chapter.
(g) Subject to subsections (d) and (f) and section 39 of this chapter,
the publisher shall:
(1) accept the provisional rule for filing;
(2) electronically record the date and time that the provisional
rule is accepted; and
(3) publish the text of the:
(A) adopted provisional rule;
(B) regulatory analysis (excluding appendices containing data,
studies, or analyses referenced in the regulatory analysis); and
(C) governor's approval in the Indiana Register.
(h) A provisional rule adopted by an agency under this section takes
effect on the latest of the following dates:
(1) The effective date of the statute delegating authority to the
agency to adopt the provisional rule.
(2) The date and time that the provisional rule is accepted for
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


filing under subsection (g).
(3) The effective date stated by the adopting agency in the
provisional rule.
(4) The date of compliance with every requirement established by
law as a prerequisite to the adoption or effectiveness of the
provisional rule.
(5) The statutory effective date for a provisional rule set forth in
law.
(i) An agency may amend a provisional rule with another
provisional rule by following the procedures in this section for the
amended provisional rule. However, unless otherwise provided by
IC 4-22-2.3, a provisional rule and all amendments of a provisional rule
by another provisional rule expire not later than one hundred eighty
(180) days after the initial provisional rule is accepted for filing under
subsection (g). Unless otherwise provided by IC 4-22-2.3-2, the subject
of the provisional rule, including all amendments to the provisional
rule, may not be subsequently extended under this section or section
37.2 of this chapter. If the governor determines that the circumstance
that is the basis for using the procedures under this section ceases to
exist, the governor may terminate the provisional rule before the lapse
of one hundred eighty (180) days. The termination is effective when
filed with the publisher. The publisher shall publish the termination
notice in the Indiana Register.
(j) Subject to subsection (k), the attorney general or the governor
may file an objection to a provisional rule that is adopted under this
section not later than forty-five (45) days after the date that a
provisional rule or amendment to a provisional rule is accepted for
filing under subsection (g). The objection must cite the document
control number for the affected provisional rule and state the basis for
the objection. When filed with the publisher, the objection has the
effect of invalidating the provisional rule or amendment to a
provisional rule. The publisher shall publish the objection in the
Indiana Register.
(k) The attorney general may file a written objection to a provisional
rule under subsection (j) only if the attorney general determines that the
provisional rule has been adopted:
(1) without statutory authority; or
(2) without complying with this section.
A notice of objection to a provisional rule by the attorney general must
include findings that explain the basis for the determination. The notice
of objection shall be provided to the agency in an electronic format.
SECTION 7. IC 4-22-2-37.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 37.2. (a) The following do not apply to a rule
adopted under this section:
(1) Sections 23 through 27 of this chapter or IC 13-14-9 (as
applicable).
(2) Sections 28 through 36 of this chapter.
This section as added by the 2023 regular session of the general
assembly applies to interim rules that are accepted for filing by the
publisher of the Indiana Register after June 30, 2023, regardless of
whether the adopting agency initiated official action to adopt the
interim rule before July 1, 2023. An action taken before July 1, 2023,
in conformity with this section (as effective after June 30, 2023) is
validated to the same extent as if the action was taken after June 30,
2023.
(b) An agency may only adopt a rule on a subject for which the
agency has rulemaking authority using the procedures in this section if
the governor finds that the agency proposing to adopt the rule has
demonstrated to the satisfaction of the governor that use of interim
rulemaking procedures under this section:
(1) is necessary to implement:
(1) (A) a new state or federal law or program, rule of another
state agency, federal regulation, or federal grant or loan
agreement, or (if used by the agency to carry out the agency's
responsibilities) a building, an equipment, a firefighting, a
safety, or a professional code adopted by a nationally
recognized organization;
(2) (B) a change in a state or federal law or program, rule of
another state agency, federal regulation, federal grant or loan
agreement, or (if used by the agency to carry out the agency's
responsibilities) a building, an equipment, a firefighting, a
safety, or a professional code adopted by a nationally
recognized organization; or
(3) (C) a category of rule authorized under IC 4-22-2.3 to be
adopted as an interim rule; and
(2) will result in a rule for which the combined
implementation and compliance costs of the rule would not
exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for
businesses, units, and individuals if effective over a two (2)
year period;
before the time that a final rule approved by the governor under section
34 of this chapter could reasonably take effect.
(c) To obtain a determination from the governor, an agency must
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


submit to the governor the text of the proposed interim rule, the
regulatory analysis required by section 22.7 of this chapter, a
statement justifying the need for interim rulemaking procedures, and
any additional information required by the governor in the form and in
the manner required by the governor. The governor may not approve
interim rulemaking for any part of a proposed interim rule that:
(1) adds or amends language to increase or expand application of
a fee, fine, or civil penalty or a schedule of fees, fines, or civil
penalties; or
(2) is expected to exceed the threshold set forth in section
22.7(c)(6) of this chapter;
prior to the budget committee's administrative rules oversight
committee's review of the proposed interim rule. A notice of
determination by the governor shall include findings that explain the
basis for the determination. The notice of determination shall be
provided to the agency in an electronic format. Approval of a request
shall be treated as a determination that the rule meets the criteria in this
subsection.
(d) To publish a notice of interim rulemaking in the Indiana
Register, the agency must submit the following to the publisher:
(1) The full text of the agency's proposed interim rule in the form
required by section 20 of this chapter.
(2) The regulatory analysis submitted to the governor under
subsection (c).
(3) A statement justifying the need for interim rulemaking.
(4) The approval of the governor to use interim rulemaking
procedures for the rule.
(5) If the proposed interim rule adds or amends language to
increase or expand application of a fee, fine, or civil penalty or a
schedule of fees, fines, or civil penalties, the agenda of the budget
committee administrative rules oversight committee meeting
at which the rule was scheduled for review.
(6) The documents required by section 21 of this chapter.
(7) If the proposed interim rule is expected to exceed the
threshold set forth in section 22.7(c)(6) of this chapter, the agenda
of the budget committee administrative rules oversight
committee meeting at which the rule was scheduled for review.
The publisher shall review materials submitted under this section and
determine the date that the publisher intends to include the material in
the Indiana Register. After establishing the intended publication date,
the publisher shall provide a written or an electronic mail authorization
to proceed to the agency.
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


(e) The agency shall include the following in the notice of the public
comment period:
(1) A general description of the subject matter of the proposed
interim rule, including the document control number.
(2) The full text of the agency's proposed interim rule in the form
required by section 20 of this chapter (excluding the text of a
matter incorporated by reference under section 21 of this chapter).
(3) The regulatory analysis submitted to the governor under
subsection (c) (excluding appendices containing data, studies, or
analyses referenced in the regulatory analysis).
(4) A statement justifying any requirement or cost that is:
(A) imposed on a regulated entity under the interim rule; and
(B) not expressly required by the statute authorizing the
agency to adopt rules or any other state or federal law.
The statement required under this subdivision must include a
reference to any data, studies, or analyses relied upon by the
agency in determining that the imposition of the requirement or
cost is necessary.
(5) Information concerning where, when, and how a person may
inspect and copy any data, studies, or analyses referenced under
subdivision (4).
(6) Information concerning where, when, and how a person may
inspect any documents incorporated by reference into the
proposed interim rule under section 21 of this chapter.
(7) A date that is thirty (30) days after the notice is published in
the Indiana Register by which written comments are due and a
statement explaining that any person may submit written
comments concerning the proposed interim rule during the public
comment period and instructions on when, where, and how the
person may submit written comments.
However, inadequacy or insufficiency of the subject matter description
under subdivision (1) or a statement of justification under subdivision
(4) in a notice does not invalidate a rulemaking action. An agency may
continue the public comment period by publishing a subsequent notice
in the Indiana Register extending the public comment period.
(f) Before adopting the interim rule, the agency shall prepare a
written response to comments received by the agency, including the
reasons for rejecting any recommendations made in the comments.
(g) After an agency has completed the public comment period and
complied with subsection (f), the agency may:
(1) adopt a rule that is identical to a proposed interim rule
published in the Indiana Register under this section; or
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


(2) adopt a revised version of a proposed interim rule published
under this section and include provisions that did not appear in
the initially published proposed version.
An agency may not adopt an interim rule that substantially differs from
the version of the proposed interim rule published in the Indiana
Register under this section, unless it is a logical outgrowth of any
proposed interim rule as supported by any written comments submitted
during the public comment period.
(h) After the agency adopts the interim rule, the agency shall submit
the following to the publisher for filing:
(1) The text of the adopted interim rule. The agency shall submit
the full text of the interim rule in the form required by section 20
of this chapter.
(2) A summary of the comments received by the agency during
the public comment period and the agency's response to the
comments.
(3) A signature page that indicates that the agency has adopted the
interim rule in conformity with all procedures required by law.
(4) The documents required by section 21 of this chapter.
The publisher shall determine the format of the interim rule and other
documents to be submitted under this subsection. An interim rule may
suspend but not repeal a rule approved by the governor under section
34 of this chapter.
(i) Subject to subsection (h) and section 39 of this chapter, the
publisher shall:
(1) accept the interim rule for filing;
(2) electronically record the date and time that the interim rule is
accepted; and
(3) publish the text of the:
(A) adopted interim rule;
(B) regulatory analysis (excluding appendices containing data,
studies, or analyses referenced in the regulatory analysis); and
(C) governor's approval in the Indiana Register.
(j) An interim rule adopted by an agency under this section takes
effect on the latest of the following dates:
(1) The effective date of the statute delegating authority to the
agency to adopt the interim rule.
(2) The date and time that the interim rule is accepted for filing
under subsection (i).
(3) The effective date stated by the adopting agency in the interim
rule.
(4) The date of compliance with every requirement established by
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


law as a prerequisite to the adoption or effectiveness of the
interim rule.
(5) The statutory effective date for an interim rule set forth in law.
(k) An agency may amend an interim rule with another interim rule
by following the procedures in this section for adoption of an interim
rule. Except as provided in IC 4-22-2.3, an interim rule and all
subsequent rules on the same subject adopted under section 37.1 of this
chapter or this section expire not later than four hundred twenty-five
(425) days after the initial interim rule is accepted for filing under
subsection (i).
(l) Subject to subsection (m), the attorney general or the governor
may file an objection to an interim rule that is adopted under this
section not later than forty-five (45) days after the date that an interim
rule or amendment to an interim rule is accepted for filing under
subsection (i). The objection must cite the document control number
for the affected interim rule and state the basis for the objection. When
filed with the publisher, the objection has the effect of invalidating the
interim rule or amendment to an interim rule. The publisher shall
publish the objection in the Indiana Register.
(m) The attorney general may file a written objection to an interim
rule under subsection (l) only if the attorney general determines that the
interim rule has been adopted:
(1) without statutory authority; or
(2) without complying with this section.
A notice of objection to an interim rule by the attorney general must
include findings that explain the basis for the determination. The notice
of objection shall be provided to the agency in an electronic format.
SECTION 8. IC 4-22-2-40, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2023,
SECTION 37, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 40. (a) At any time before a rule is accepted for
filing by the publisher under section 35, 37.1, 37.2, or 38 of this
chapter, the agency that adopted the rule may recall it. A rule may be
recalled regardless of whether:
(1) the rule has been disapproved by the attorney general under
section 32 of this chapter; or
(2) the rule has been disapproved by the governor under section
34 of this chapter.
(b) IC 13-14-9 and sections 23 through 38 of this chapter do not
apply to a recall action under this section. However, the agency shall
distribute a notice of its recall action to the publisher for publication in
the Indiana Register. IC 13-14-9 and sections 23 and 26 of this chapter
do not apply to a readoption action under subsection (c).
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


(c) After an agency recalls a rule, the agency may reconsider its
adoption action and adopt an identical rule or a revised rule. However,
if IC 13-14-9 or sections 23 through 36 of this chapter apply to the
recalled rule, the readopted rule must comply with the requirements
under section 29 of this chapter or IC 13-14-9-9 (as applicable).
(d) The recall of a rule under this section voids any approval given
after the rule was adopted and before the rule was recalled.
(e) If a rule is:
(1) subject to sections 31 and 33 of this chapter;
(2) recalled under subsection (a); and
(3) readopted under subsection (c);
the agency shall resubmit the readopted version of the recalled rule to
the attorney general and the governor for approval. The agency shall
include sufficient information for the governor to evaluate whether
the readopted version of the recalled rule complies with the
requirements of section 22.8(a) of this chapter. The attorney general
and the governor have the full statutory period to approve or
disapprove the readopted rule. The agency shall resubmit the readopted
version of a recalled rule to the office of management and budget with
sufficient information for the office of management and budget to
evaluate whether the initial regulatory analysis submitted to the office
of management and budget under section 22.8 of this chapter needs to
be revised. If the impact of the readopted rule is substantially different
from the recalled rule, the agency shall submit the revised regulatory
analysis to the publisher for publication in the Indiana Register with the
document control number assigned by the publisher to the rule. The
agency also shall comply with any other applicable approval
requirement provided by statute.
(f) The readopted version of a recalled rule is effective only after the
agency has complied with section 35, 37.1, 37.2, or 38 of this chapter.
SECTION 9. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) IC 4-22-2-19.6,
IC 4-22-2-22.7, IC 4-22-2-22.8, IC 4-22-2-23, IC 4-22-2-37.1,
IC 4-22-2-37.2, and IC 4-22-2-40, all as amended by this act, apply
to a rulemaking action that commences after June 30, 2026.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 10. An emergency is declared for this act.
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Appropriations, to which
was referred Senate Bill No. 172, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 4-12-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 2.5. Administrative Rules Oversight Committee
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agency" has the meaning set
forth in IC 4-22-2-3.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "committee" refers to the
administrative rules oversight committee established by section 4
of this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "rule" has the meaning set forth
in IC 4-22-2-3.
Sec. 4. The administrative rules oversight committee is
established.
Sec. 5. (a) The committee consists of the following twelve (12)
members of the general assembly:
(1) The chairperson of the senate appropriations committee.
(2) The ranking majority member of the senate
appropriations committee.
(3) The chairperson of the senate tax and fiscal policy
committee.
(4) The ranking majority member of the senate tax and fiscal
policy committee.
(5) The chairperson of the house ways and means committee.
(6) The ranking majority member of the house ways and
means committee.
(7) The chairperson of the house government and regulatory
reform committee.
(8) The ranking majority member of the house government
and regulatory reform committee.
(9) Two (2) minority members of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives as
follows:
(A) The ranking minority member of the house ways and
means committee.
(B) One (1) other minority member of the house ways and
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


means committee.
(10) Two (2) minority members of the senate appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate as follows:
(A) The ranking minority member of the senate
appropriations committee.
(B) The ranking minority member of the senate tax and
fiscal policy committee.
(b) Legislative appointments to the committee under subsection
(a)(9) and (a)(10) shall be made within fifteen (15) days after the
official selection of the president pro tempore of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives. However, in the case of
2026, the legislative appointments to the committee under
subsection (a)(9) and (a)(10) shall made after the adjournment sine
die of the second regular session of the one hundred twenty-fourth
general assembly and before July 1, 2026. Each member appointed
under subsection (a)(9) and (a)(10) shall serve at the will and
pleasure of the member's respective appointing leadership or until
the member's term as a member of the general assembly expires,
whichever is shorter.
(c) Any vacancy occurring on the committee must be filled by
the appointing authority for the unexpired term.
Sec. 6. (a) The chairperson of the committee shall be:
(1) the chairperson of the senate appropriations committee, in
those years that the chairperson of the house ways and means
committee is serving as the chair of the budget committee;
and
(2) the chairperson of the house ways and means committee,
in those years that the chairperson of the senate
appropriations committee is serving as the chair of the budget
committee.
(b) Unless the committee has no agenda, the committee shall
meet on those same days of the year and at the same location that
the budget committee has fixed to meet. The committee shall fix the
time for its meetings.
Sec. 7. (a) The rule of any agency shall be subject to committee
review if the implementation and compliance costs of the proposed
rule are expected to exceed the threshold set forth in
IC 4-22-2-22.7(c)(6).
(b) However, this section does not apply to a rule described in
IC 4-22-2-22.7(f).
(c) For purposes of any statute that requires committee review
before an action may be taken by a state agency or other entity,
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


committee review is considered to have taken place when the action
requiring review has been included on an approved agenda of the
committee in the part of the agenda concerning review items.
Sec. 8. (a) Seven (7) members of the committee constitute a
quorum.
(b) The affirmative vote of seven (7) members of the committee
is required for the committee to take any action.
Sec. 9. (a) Each member of the committee is entitled to receive
the same per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid to members
of the general assembly serving on interim study committees
established by the legislative council. These expenses shall be paid
from funds appropriated to the legislative council.
(b) Members of the committee shall not receive a salary per
diem under this section if the member receives any salary per diem
for the member's services at a budget committee meeting on the
same day under IC 4-12-1-11(b).
Sec. 10. Staff for the committee shall be provided by the
legislative services agency.
SECTION 2. IC 4-22-2-19.6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2024,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19.6. (a) A rule adopted under this article or
IC 13-14-9 that includes a fee, fine, or civil penalty must comply with
this section. Subsections (b), (c), and (d) do not apply to a rule that
must be adopted in a certain form to comply with federal law.
(b) For each fee, fine, or civil penalty imposed by an agency that is
not set as a specific amount in a state law, a rule must describe the
circumstances for which the agency will assess a fee, fine, or civil
penalty and set forth the amount of the fee, fine, or civil penalty:
(1) as a specific dollar amount;
(2) under a formula by which a specific dollar amount can be
reasonably calculated by persons regulated or otherwise affected
by the rule; or
(3) as a range of potential dollar amounts, stating the factors that
the agency will utilize to set a specific dollar amount in an
individual case with sufficient certainty that a review of an agency
action under IC 4-21.5 or comparable process can evaluate
whether the amount was reasonable.
A rule concerning fines or civil penalties does not prohibit an agency
to enter into a settlement agreement with a person against whom a fine
or civil penalty is being assessed to determine the fine or civil penalty
to be paid for a violation.
(c) The amount of a fee must be reasonably based on the amount
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


necessary to carry out the purposes for which the fee is imposed.
(d) An agency setting a fine or civil penalty shall consider the
following:
(1) Whether the violation has a major or minor impact on the
health, safety, or welfare of a person, the health or safety of
animals or natural resources, or other facts set forth in the
agency's rule.
(2) The number of previous violations committed by the offender
of laws, rules, or programs administered by the agency.
(3) The need for deterrence of future violations.
(4) Whether the conduct, if proved beyond a reasonable doubt,
would constitute a criminal offense, and the level of penalty set by
law for the criminal offense.
(e) An agency is not liable for a fee, fine, or civil penalty that is not
in conformity with this section if
(1) the fee, fine, or civil penalty was included in a rule that
became effective before January 1, 2023, and that otherwise
complies with subsection (b).
(2) the fee, fine, or civil penalty was:
(A) set by an agency before January 1, 2023;
(B) reviewed by the budget committee:
(i) in the case of the department of environmental
management, the boards listed in IC 13-14-9-1, the natural
resources commission, the department of natural resources,
the Indiana gaming commission, and the Indiana horse
racing commission, before December 31, 2023; and
(ii) in the case of an agency not described in item (i), before
July 1, 2024; and
(C) included in a rule that complies with this section and
becomes effective before:
(i) in the case of the department of environmental
management, the boards listed in IC 13-14-9-1, the natural
resources commission, the department of natural resources,
the Indiana gaming commission, and the Indiana horse
racing commission, December 31, 2024; and
(ii) in the case of an agency not described in item (i), July 1,
2025; or
(3) the agency withdraws or otherwise ceases to enforce or apply
the fee, fine, or civil penalty before:
(A) in the case of the department of environmental
management, the boards listed in IC 13-14-9-1, the natural
resources commission, the department of natural resources, the
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


Indiana gaming commission, and the Indiana horse racing
commission, December 31, 2023; and
(B) in the case of an agency not described in clause (A), July
1, 2024.
Readoption without changes under IC 4-22-2.6 of a nonconforming fee,
fine, or civil penalty that meets the requirements of subdivision (1) or
(2) does not invalidate the nonconforming fee, fine, or civil penalty.
(f) Beginning January 1, 2024, an agency shall post on its website
a schedule of fines and civil penalties that apply to violations of laws,
rules, and requirements of federal programs administered by the
agency.".
Page 2, delete lines 10 through 14, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(6) A determination whether the combined implementation and
compliance costs of a proposed rule are at least one million
dollars ($1,000,000) one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
for businesses, units, and individuals over any two (2) one (1)
year period.".
Page 2, line 30, strike "budget committee" and insert
"administrative rules oversight committee".
Page 5, line 5, strike "budget committee" and insert "administrative
rules oversight committee".
Page 5, line 12, strike "budget committee" and insert
"administrative rules oversight committee".
Page 5, line 15, strike "budget".
Page 5, line 16, strike "committee." and insert "administrative
rules oversight committee.".
Page 6, line 19, strike "budget".
Page 6, line 20, strike "committee" and insert "administrative rules
oversight committee".
Page 6, line 23, strike "budget committee" and insert
"administrative rules oversight committee".
Page 9, line 1, strike "budget committee's" and insert
"administrative rules oversight committee's".
Page 9, line 25, strike "budget committee" and insert
"administrative rules oversight committee".
Page 9, line 29, strike "budget committee" and insert
"administrative rules oversight committee".
Page 13, line 3, strike "budget committee's" and insert
"administrative rules oversight committee's".
Page 13, line 20, strike "budget".
Page 13, line 21, strike "committee" and insert "administrative
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125


rules oversight committee".
Page 13, line 25, strike "budget committee" and insert
"administrative rules oversight committee".
Page 17, line 20, after "(a)" insert "IC 4-22-2-19.6,".
Page 17, after line 24, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 9. An emergency is declared for this act.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 172 as introduced.)
GARTEN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 0.
SB 172—LS 6401/DI 125